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DTC B1213 Tilt and Telescopic ECU communication
stop

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when communication stops between the Tilt and telescopic ECU and the Body ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B1211
No communication from Tilt and telesco pic ECU for more than S Tilt and telescopic ECU

B1211
No communication from Tilt and telescopic ECU for more than
10 seconds.

S Tilt and telescopic ECU
SWireharness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−111 8.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckTiltandtelescopicECU.

CHECK:
Check the operation of the manual Tilt and telescopic.
HINT:
With this inspection, whether or not the Tilt and telescopic ECU functions normally can be diagnosed.

NG Replace Tilt and telescopic ECU.

OK
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2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.

Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal

Tilt and telescopicECU − BodyECU MPX1 (T11−3) − MPX2(B 12−23)

CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.

OK:
There is a continuity between the connectors.

HINT:
If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.

NG Repair or replace wire harness.

OK

Replace Tilt and telescopic ECU.


